Utah statutes.
11-42-404.   Adoption of a resolution or ordinance levying an assessment --
Notice of the adoption -- Effective date of resolution or ordinance -- Notice
of assessment interest.
(1) (a)  After receiving a final report from a board of equalization under
Subsection 11-42-403(5) or, if applicable, after the time for filing an appeal
under Subsection 11-42-403(6) has passed, the governing body may adopt a
resolution or ordinance levying an assessment against benefitted property
within the assessment area.
(b)  Each local entity that levies an assessment under this chapter shall levy
the assessment at one time only, unless the assessment is to pay operation and
maintenance costs or the costs of economic promotion activities.
(c)  An assessment resolution or ordinance adopted under Subsection (1)(a):
(i)  need not describe each tract, block, lot, part of block or lot, or parcel
of property to be assessed;
(ii)  need not include the legal description or tax identification number of
the parcels of property assessed in the assessment area; and
(iii)  is adequate for purposes of identifying the property to be assessed
within the assessment area if the assessment resolution or ordinance
incorporates by reference the corrected assessment list that describes the
property assessed by legal description and tax identification number.
(2) (a)  Each local entity that adopts an assessment resolution or ordinance
shall give notice of the adoption by:
(i) (A)  publishing a copy of the resolution or ordinance, or a summary of the
resolution or ordinance, once in a newspaper of general circulation within the
local entity's jurisdictional boundaries; or
(B)  if there is no newspaper of general circulation with the local entity's
jurisdictional boundaries as described in Subsection (2)(a)(i)(A), posting a
copy of the resolution or ordinance in at least three public places within the
local entity's jurisdictional boundaries for at least 21 days; and
(ii)  publishing, in accordance with Section 45-1-101, a copy of the
resolution or ordinance for at least 21 days.
(b)  No other publication or posting of the resolution or ordinance is
required.
(3)  Notwithstanding any other statutory provision regarding the effective
date of a resolution or ordinance, each assessment resolution or ordinance
takes effect:
(a)  on the date of publication or posting of the notice under Subsection (2);
or
(b)  at a later date provided in the resolution or ordinance.
(4) (a)  The governing body of each local entity that has adopted an
assessment resolution or ordinance under Subsection (1) shall, within five
days after the 25-day prepayment period under Subsection 11-42-411(6) has
passed, file a notice of assessment interest with the recorder of the county
in which the assessed property is located.
(b)  Each notice of assessment interest under Subsection (4)(a) shall:
(i)  state that the local entity has an assessment interest in the assessed
property;
(ii)  if the assessment is to pay operation and maintenance costs or for
economic promotion activities, state the maximum number of years over which an
assessment will be payable; and
(iii)  describe the property assessed by legal description and tax
identification number.
(c)  A local entity's failure to file a notice of assessment interest under
this Subsection (4) has no affect on the validity of an assessment levied
under an assessment resolution or ordinance adopted under Subsection (1).
